Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4829
Claims of holders of void or voidable rights.

(1) No claims of a creditor who has received or acquired a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance voidable under the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act shall be allowed unless he or she surrenders the preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance. If the avoidance is effected by a proceeding in which a final judgment has been entered, the claim shall not be allowed unless the money is paid or the property is delivered to the liquidator within thirty days from the date of the entering of the final judgment, except that the court having jurisdiction over the liquidation may allow further time if there is an appeal or other continuation of the proceeding.

(2) A claim allowable under subsection (1) of this section by reason of the avoidance, whether voluntary or involuntary, of a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance may be filed as an excused late filing under section 44-4835 if filed within thirty days from the date of the avoidance or within the further time allowed by the court under subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 29.